Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-32,108
Council; funding authorized; Governor; duty.

For purposes of sections 2-32,102 to 2-32,108 there is hereby authorized an initial amount of fifty thousand dollars for the State of Nebraska to enter into agreements with the states listed in section 2-32,102 and to carry out the purpose and intent of sections 2-32,102 to 2-32,108 if such sum is matched by at least two other states listed in section 2-32,102. It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds authorized by this section shall be appropriated to the Governor, who shall be responsible for the implementation of sections 2-32,102 to 2-32,108.

Laws 1985, LB 705, § 7.